Massachusetts, session 194th, H3452.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 164 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 94I the
following section:-
Section 94J. (a) In any base rate proceeding conducted by the department under section
94 for electric companies or gas companies, the department may not approve an allowed return
on equity higher than the average allowed return on equity approved in neighboring states over
the preceding 4 years. Such requirement may be waived only upon a specific showing that the
constitutional rights of the electric or gas company would otherwise be violated.
of 2

(b) The determination of allowed return on equity under this section shall not include
compensation related to programs under section 21 of chapter 25 or any performance incentives
designed to promote the efficient, clean, and reliable operation of the electric or gas system.
(c) For the purposes of this section, “neighboring states” shall mean Connecticut, Rhode
Island, Maine, Vermont, and New Hampshire.
of 2